Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB9.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1156YC (4) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 708.3A, subsection 5, paragraph d, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 d. âHealth care providerâ means an emergency medical care 3 provider as defined in chapter 147A or a person licensed 4 or registered under chapter 148 , 148C , 148D , or 152 who is 5 providing or who is attempting to provide emergency medical 6 services, as defined in section 147A.1 , or who is providing 7 or who is attempting to provide health services as defined in 8 section 10A.711 in working, volunteering, or participating 9 in an educational course of instruction at a hospital or 10 rural emergency hospital as defined in chapter 135B . A 11 person who commits an assault under this section against a 12 health care provider in a hospital, or at the scene or during 13 out-of-hospital patient transportation in an ambulance, is 14 presumed to know that the person against whom the assault is 15 committed is a health care provider. 16